Illinois, session 104th, HB1421.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 1. VETERANS DAY PAID LEAVE ACT 5    Section 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Veterans Day Paid Leave Act. 7    Section 1-5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Employer" means any public or private employer with a 9place of business in this State.10    "Veteran" means an Illinois resident who: (i) is employed 11at a place of business in this State; (ii) has served as a 12member of the United States Armed Forces on active duty or 13State active duty, as a member of the Illinois National Guard, 14or as a member of the United States Reserve Forces; and (iii) 15was discharged or separated under honorable conditions.16    "Veterans Day" means the eleventh day of November of each 17year. 18    Section 1-10. Paid leave for Veterans Day. 19    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on and 20after January 1, 2026, each employer shall provide each 21employee who is a veteran with one paid day off each year on   HB1421- 2 -LRB104 03380 HLH 13402 b1Veterans Day if the employee would otherwise be required to 2work on that day. The employee must provide the employer with 3at least 30 calendar days' notice that the employee intends to 4take time off on Veterans Day. The employee must also provide 5the employer with documentation verifying that the employee is 6a veteran.7    (b) If the employer is unable to provide time off to each 8veteran, as provided in subsection (a), without experiencing 9significant economic or operational disruption, then the 10employer may deny such a time off request, but only to the 11extent necessary to avoid the significant economic or 12operational disruption. If the employer denies a time off 13request under this subsection, the employer must notify the 14employee at least 14 calendar days prior to Veterans Day that 15his or her request has been denied and must make a good faith 16effort to provide the employee with a substitute day on which 17the employee may receive paid time off. Except as otherwise 18provided in this subsection with respect to veterans who are 19employed in positions that are subject to a collective 20bargaining agreement, if the veteran is employed by a public 21employer as a firefighter, police officer, emergency medical 22technician, or paramedic, then, in lieu of providing the 23veteran with a substitute day off, the public employer may 24require the veteran to work on Veterans Day if the employer 25compensates the veteran at the rate of at least 2 times his or 26her hourly wages on that day. Notwithstanding the provisions   HB1421- 3 -LRB104 03380 HLH 13402 b1of this subsection (b), if the veteran is employed in a 2position that is subject to a collective bargaining agreement 3and the veteran is required to work on Veterans Day under the 4terms of the collective bargaining agreement, then the 5employer shall provide the veteran with a substitute day on 6which the employee may receive paid time off at the rate of 7compensation that applies to the veteran under the terms of 8the collective bargaining agreement. 9ARTICLE 5. INCOME TAX PROVISIONS 10    Section 5-5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 11adding Section 246 as follows: 12    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)13    Sec. 246. Wages paid to veterans under the Veterans Day 14Paid Leave Act.15    (a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 162026, each taxpayer is entitled to a credit against the tax 17imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 18in an amount equal to 100% of the wages paid by the taxpayer 19during the taxable year to veterans as a result of the paid day 20off required under the Veterans Day Paid Leave Act. For 21partners of partnerships and shareholders of Subchapter S 22corporations, there shall be allowed a credit under this 23Section to be determined in accordance with the determination   HB1421- 4 -LRB104 03380 HLH 13402 b1of income and distributive share of income under Sections 702 2and 704 and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. 3    (b) A taxpayer claiming the credit provided by this 4Section shall maintain and record such information as the 5Department may require by rule regarding the credit claimed 6under this Section. 7    (c) In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce 8the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 9the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 10may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 115 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 12credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 13a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 14that are available to offset a liability, the earlier credit 15shall be applied first. 16    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 17250.  18ARTICLE 99. EFFECTIVE DATE 19    Section 99-99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.